Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 03. Negotiable Instruments.

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

45.05.246

— 45.05.402.
Renumbered in 1980. To determine the former number of a particular section, see the Tables of Sections Amended in volume 11.

Cross references. —

For inapplicability of the amendments made to this chapter by ch. 35, SLA 1993, to rights and obligations arising under this chapter before January 1, 1994, see § 129(a), ch. 35, SLA 1993 in the Temporary and Special Acts; see also AS

01.10.100

.